Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 15
[OLD]

VOTING
MACHINES

REPEALED. L 1970, c 26, §3.

CHAPTER 15
[OLD]

ABSENTEE
VOTING

REPEALED. L 1975, c 36, pt of §3.

CHAPTER 15

ABSENTEE
VOTING

Section

15-1 Definitions

15-2 Who may vote by absentee ballot

15-2.5 Absentee voting in precinct affected by
natural

disasters

15-3 Absentee ballot for presidential election

15-3.5 Repealed

15-4 Request for absentee ballot

15-5 Delivery of ballots

15-6 Return envelope, ballot envelope;
instructions

15-6.5 Absentee postage

15-7 Absentee polling place

15-8 Absentee ballot box

15-9 Return and receipt of absentee ballots

15-10 Counting of absentee ballots

15-11 Voting by absentee voter at polls
prohibited

15-12 Receipt and disposition of late absentee
ballots

15-13 Death of voter prior to opening of polls

15-14 Ballots; where voting machines are used

Case Notes

Hawaiian absentee ballot statute and regulations adequately
protect the secrecy and integrity of the ballot process. 849 F.2d 1176.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next